Alaska, session 34, SB3001.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 12 * Section 1. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section 01 to read: 02 LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS AND INTENT. (a) The legislature finds that the tax 03 treatment in sec. 26 of this Act is necessary to advance a major natural gas project and to 04 ensure that 05 (1) the project maximizes the benefit to the state by ensuring direct and 06 affordable access to natural gas to the residents of the state; and 07 (2) communities affected by the natural gas project are protected from the 08 negative effects of the project. 09 (b) Nothing in this Act is intended to establish, modify, impair, waive, or otherwise 10 affect the tax treatment, assessment methodology, valuation, taxing authority, or applicability 11 of taxes imposed under AS 29.45 or AS 43.56 with respect to any other property, project, 12 facility, infrastructure, or taxpayer. It is the intent of the legislature that this Act be narrowly 13 construed and not serve as precedent, guidance, or interpretive authority for the taxation of 14 any other property subject to taxation under AS 29.45 or AS 43.56. 15 * Sec. 2. AS 14.17.410(b), as amended by sec. 7, ch. 22, SLA 2026, is amended to read: 16 (b) Public school funding consists of state aid, a required local contribution, 17 and eligible federal impact aid determined as follows: 18 (1) state aid equals basic need minus a required local contribution and 19 90 percent of eligible federal impact aid for t hat fiscal year; basic need equals the sum 20 obtained under (D) of this paragraph, multiplied by the base student allocation set out 21 in AS 14.17.470; district adjusted ADM is calculated as follows: 22 (A) the ADM of each school in the district is calculated by 23 applying the school size factor to the student count as set out in AS 14.17.450; 24 (B) the number obtained under (A) of this paragraph is 25 multiplied by the district cost factor described in AS 14.17.460; 26 (C) the ADMs of each school in a district, as adjusted 27 according to (A) and (B) of this paragraph, are added; the sum is then 28 multiplied by the special needs factor set out in AS 14.17.420(a)(1) and the 29 secondary school vocational and technical instruction funding factor set out in 30 AS 14.17.420(a)(3); 31 (D) the number obtained for intensive services under 01 AS 14.17.420(a)(2) and the number obtained for correspondence study under 02 AS 14.17.430 are added to the number obtained under (C) of this paragraph or 03 under (H) and (I) of this paragraph; 04 (E) notwithstanding (A) - (C) of this paragraph, if a school 05 district's ADM adjusted for school size under (A) of this paragraph decreases 06 by five percent or more from one fiscal year to the next fiscal year, the school 07 district may use the last fiscal year before the decrease as a base fiscal year to 08 offset the decrease, according to the following method: 09 (i) for the first fiscal year after the base fiscal year 10 determined under this subparagraph, the school district's ADM adjusted 11 for school size determined under (A) of this paragraph is calculated as 12 the district's ADM adjusted for school size, plus 75 percent of the 13 difference in the district's ADM adjusted for school size between the 14 base fiscal year and the first fiscal year after the base fiscal year; 15 (ii) for the second fiscal year after the base fiscal year 16 determined under this subparagraph, the school district's ADM adjusted 17 for school size determined under (A) of this paragraph is calculated as 18 the district's ADM adjusted for school size, plus 50 percent of the 19 difference in the district's ADM adjusted for school size between the 20 base fiscal year and the second fiscal year after the base fiscal year; 21 (iii) for the third fiscal year after the base fiscal year 22 determined under this subparagraph, the school district's ADM adjusted 23 for school size determined under (A) of this paragraph is calculated as 24 the district's ADM adjusted for school size, plus 25 percent of the 25 difference in the district's ADM adjusted for school size between the 26 base fiscal year and the third fiscal year after the base fiscal year; 27 (F) the method established in (E) of this paragraph is available 28 to a school district for the three fiscal years following the base fiscal year 29 determined under (E) of this paragraph only if the district's ADM adjusted for 30 school size determined under (A) of this paragraph for each fiscal year is less 31 than the district's ADM adjusted for school size in the base fiscal year; 01 (G) the method established in (E) of this paragraph does not 02 apply to a decrease in the district's ADM adjusted for school size resulting 03 from a loss of enrollment that occurs as a result of a boundary change under 04 AS 29; 05 (H) notwithstanding (A) - (C) of this paragraph, if one or more 06 schools close and consolidate with one or more other schools in the same 07 community and district and, as a result of the consolidation, basic need 08 generated by the district's ADM of the consolidated schools as adjusted under 09 (A) - (C) of this paragraph decreases, the district may use the last fiscal year 10 before the consolidation as the base fiscal year to offset that decrease for the 11 first four fiscal years following consolidation according to the following 12 method: 13 (i) for the first two fiscal years after the base fiscal year, 14 the district's ADM of the consolidated schools as adjusted under (A) - 15 (C) of this paragraph is calculated by dividing the sum of the district's 16 ADM of the consolidated schools as adjusted under (A) - (C) of this 17 paragraph for the base fiscal year by the sum of the district's ADM of 18 the consolidated schools for the base fiscal year without adjustment, 19 and subtracting the quotient obtained by dividing the district's ADM of 20 the consolidated schools for the current fiscal year as adjusted under 21 (A) - (C) of this paragraph by the sum of the district's ADM of the 22 consolidated schools for the current fiscal year without adjustment, 23 multiplying that number by the sum of the district's ADM of the 24 consolidated schools for the current fiscal year without adjustment, and 25 adding that number to the sum of the district's ADM of the consolidated 26 schools for the current fiscal year as adjusted under (A) - (C) of this 27 paragraph; 28 (ii) for the third fiscal year after the base fiscal year, the 29 district's ADM of the consolidated schools as adjusted under (A) - (C) 30 of this paragraph is calculated by dividing the sum of the district's 31 ADM of the consolidated schools as adjusted under (A) - (C) of this 01 paragraph for the base fiscal year by the sum of the district's ADM of 02 the consolidated schools for the base fiscal year without adjustment, 03 and subtracting the quotient obtained by dividing the sum of the 04 district's ADM of the consolidated schools for the current fiscal year as 05 adjusted under (A) - (C) of this paragraph by the sum of the district's 06 ADM of the consolidated schools for the current fiscal year, 07 multiplying that number by the sum of the district's ADM of the 08 consolidated schools for the current fiscal year without adjustment, 09 multiplying that number by 66 percent, and adding that number to the 10 sum of the district's ADM of the consolidated schools for the current 11 fiscal year as adjusted under (A) - (C) of this paragraph; 12 (iii) for the fourth fiscal year after the base fiscal year, 13 the district's ADM of the consolidated schools as adjusted under (A) - 14 (C) of this paragraph is calculated by dividing the sum of the district's 15 ADM of the consolidated schools as adjusted under (A) - (C) of this 16 paragraph for the base fiscal year by the sum of the district's ADM of 17 the consolidated schools for the base fiscal year without adjustment, 18 and subtracting the quotient obtained by dividing the sum of the 19 district's ADM of the consolidated schools for the current fiscal year as 20 adjusted under (A) - (C) of this paragraph by the sum of the district's 21 ADM of the consolidated schools for the current fiscal year, 22 multiplying that number by the sum of the district's ADM of the 23 consolidated schools for the current fiscal year without adjustment, 24 multiplying that number by 33 percent, and adding that number to the 25 sum of the district's ADM of the consolidated schools for the current 26 fiscal year as adjusted under (A) - (C) of this paragraph; 27 (iv) to calculate the district's basic need for each fiscal 28 year, the number obtained through the calculation in (i), (ii), or (iii) of 29 this subparagraph is added to the number obtained under (C) of this 30 paragraph for the remainder of the district; 31 (I) if the basic need calculated under (H)(i) - (iii) of this 01 paragraph for one of the first four fiscal years after consolidation is less than 02 the basic need calculated under (A) - (C) of this paragraph for that fiscal year, 03 the basic need may not be adjusted under (H) of this paragraph for that fiscal 04 year; 05 (J) a district may not offset a decrease under (H) of this 06 paragraph if 07 (i) a new facility is constructed in the district for the 08 consolidation; or 09 (ii) the district offset a decrease under (E) of this 10 paragraph in the same fiscal year; 11 (K) a district that offsets a decrease under (H) of this paragraph 12 may not reopen a school that was closed for consolidation in the district until 13 (i) four or more years have passed since the school 14 closure; and 15 (ii) the district provides evidence satisfactory to the 16 department that the schools affected by the consolidation are over 17 capacity; 18 (L) a district may not reopen and reconsolidate a school that 19 was consolidated in the district more than once every four years for purposes 20 of the calculations made under (H) of this paragraph; 21 (M) a district offsetting a decrease under (H) of this paragraph 22 shall provide the department with the list of schools participating in the 23 consolidation and the corresponding ADM; 24 (2) the required local contribution of a city or borough school district 25 (A) is calculated by combining 26 (i) the equivalent of a 2.65 mill tax levy on the full and 27 true value of the taxable real and personal property in the district as of 28 January 1 of the second preceding fiscal year, as determined by the 29 Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development 30 under AS 14.17.510 and AS 29.45.110, not to exceed the amount 31 calculated under this sub-subparagraph for the preceding fiscal 01 year by more than four percent; and 02 (ii) if the city or borough of the school district 03 collects an alternative volumetric tax under AS 43.59.030, or if the 04 state collects an alternative volumetric tax on behalf of the city or 05 borough of the school district under AS 43.59.030, an amount equal 06 to a portion of the alternative volumetric tax collected, calculated 07 by multiplying the alternative volumetric tax collected by or on 08 behalf of the city or borough under AS 43.59.030 by 2.65 and 09 dividing the product by the mill rate set out in AS 43.56.010(a); 10 (B) [; THE REQUIRED LOCAL CONTRIBUTION] may not 11 exceed [(A)] 45 percent of a district's basic need for 12 (i) the preceding fiscal year as determined under (1) of 13 this subsection; or 14 (ii) [(B) THE AMOUNT OF THE DISTRICT'S 15 REQUIRED LOCAL CONTRIBUTION FOR] the second preceding 16 fiscal year as determined under (1) of this subsection by more than 17 four percent. 18 * Sec. 3. AS 14.17.510 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 19 (d) In this section, the full and true value of the taxable real and personal 20 property does not include property subject to tax abatement under AS 43.59.010 or the 21 alternative volumetric tax levied under AS 43.59.020. 22 * Sec. 4. AS 29.45.030 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 23 (o) Property of a natural gas project subject to tax abatement under 24 AS 43.59.010 or to the alternative volumetric tax under AS 43.59.020 is exempt from 25 taxation under AS 29.45. In this subsection, "natural gas project" has the meaning 26 given in AS 43.59.100. 27 * Sec. 5. AS 29.45.080(c) is amended to read: 28 (c) A municipality may levy and collect a tax on the full and true value of that 29 portion of taxable property taxable under AS 43.56 as assessed by the Department of 30 Revenue which value, when combined with the value of property otherwise taxable by 31 the municipality, does not exceed the product of the percentage determined in (f) of 01 this section of the average per capita assessed full and true value of property in the 02 state multiplied by the number of residents of the taxing municipality. Property 03 subject to tax abatement under AS 43.59.010 or to the alternative volumetric tax 04 levied under AS 43.59.020 is not included in the value of property for the purpose 05 of making the calculation under this subsection. 06 * Sec. 6. AS 31.25.010 is amended to read: 07 Sec. 31.25.010. Structure. The Alaska Gasline Development Corporation is a 08 public corporation and government instrumentality acting in the best interest and as a 09 fiduciary of the state for the purposes required by AS 31.25.005, located for 10 administrative purposes in the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic 11 Development, but having a legal existence independent of and separate from the state. 12 The corporation may not be terminated as long as it has bonds, notes, or other 13 obligations outstanding. The corporation may dissolve when no bonds, notes, or other 14 obligations of the corporation or a subsidiary of the corporation are outstanding and 15 the corporation or a subsidiary of the corporation is no longer engaged in the 16 development, financing, construction, or operation of an in-state natural gas pipeline 17 or an Alaska liquefied natural gas project. Upon termination of the corporation, its 18 rights and property pass to the state. 19 * Sec. 7. AS 31.25.040(b) is amended to read: 20 (b) The board shall by regulation adopted under AS 44.62 (Administrative 21 Procedure Act) adopt and publish procedures to govern the procurement by the 22 corporation of supplies, services, professional services, and construction. The 23 procurement procedures must 24 (1) reflect competitive bidding principles and provide vendors 25 reasonable and equitable opportunities to participate in the procurement 26 process; 27 (2) include procurement methods to meet emergency and 28 extraordinary circumstances; 29 (3) comply with the five percent preference under AS 36.30.321(a); 30 and 31 (4) provide for an Alaska veterans' preference that is consistent with 01 the Alaska veterans' preference in AS 36.30.175. 02 * Sec. 8. AS 31.25.080(a) is amended to read: 03 (a) In addition to other powers granted in this chapter, the corporation may 04 (1) determine the form of ownership and the operating structure of an 05 in-state natural gas pipeline developed by the corporation and may, subject to 06 AS 31.25.120(b), enter into agreements with other persons for joint ownership, joint 07 operation, or both of an in-state natural gas pipeline or an Alaska liquefied natural gas 08 project; 09 (2) plan, finance, construct, develop, acquire, maintain, and operate a 10 pipeline system and other transportation mechanism, including pipelines, compressors, 11 storage facilities, and other related facilities, equipment, and works of public 12 improvement, in the state to facilitate production, transportation, and delivery of 13 natural gas or other related natural resources to the point of consumption or to the 14 point of distribution for consumption; 15 (3) lease or rent facilities, structures, and properties; 16 (4) exercise the power of eminent domain and file a declaration of 17 taking under AS 09.55.240 - 09.55.460 to acquire land or an interest in land that is 18 necessary for an in-state natural gas pipeline or an Alaska liquefied natural gas project; 19 the exercise of powers by the corporation under this paragraph may not exceed the 20 permissible exercise of the powers by the state; 21 (5) acquire, by purchase, lease, or gift, land, structures, real or personal 22 property, an interest in property, a right-of-way, a franchise, an easement, or other 23 interest in land, or an interest in or right to capacity in a pipeline system determined to 24 be necessary or convenient for the development, financing, construction, or operation 25 of an in-state natural gas pipeline project or an Alaska liquefied natural gas project or 26 part of an in-state natural gas pipeline project or an Alaska liquefied natural gas 27 project; 28 (6) subject to AS 31.25.120(b), transfer or otherwise dispose of all or 29 part of an in-state natural gas pipeline project, an Alaska liquefied natural gas project, 30 or an interest in an asset of the corporation; 31 (7) elect to provide transportation of natural gas as a contract carrier, 01 common carrier, or otherwise; 02 (8) provide light, water, security, and other services for property of the 03 corporation; 04 (9) conduct hearings to gather and develop data consistent with the 05 purpose and powers of the corporation; 06 (10) advocate for new pipeline capacity before the Federal Energy 07 Regulatory Commission; 08 (11) make and execute agreements, contracts, and other instruments 09 necessary or convenient in the exercise of the powers and functions of the corporation 10 under this chapter, including a contract with a person, firm, corporation, governmental 11 agency, or other entity; 12 (12) sue and be sued in its own name; 13 (13) adopt an official seal; 14 (14) adopt bylaws for the regulation of its affairs and the conduct of its 15 business and adopt regulations and policies in connection with the performance of its 16 functions and duties; 17 (15) employ fiscal consultants, engineers, attorneys, appraisers, and 18 other consultants and employees that may, in the judgment of the corporation, be 19 required and fix and pay their compensation from funds available to the corporation; 20 (16) procure insurance against a loss in connection with its operation; 21 (17) borrow money as provided in this chapter to carry out its 22 corporate purposes and issue its obligations as evidence of borrowing; 23 (18) include in a borrowing the amounts necessary to pay financing 24 charges, to pay interest on the obligations, and to pay the interest, consultant, advisory, 25 and legal fees, and other expenses that are necessary or incident to the borrowing; 26 (19) receive, administer, and comply with the conditions and 27 requirements of an appropriation, gift, grant, or donation of property or money; 28 (20) do all acts and things necessary, convenient, or desirable to carry 29 out the powers expressly granted or necessarily implied in this chapter; 30 (21) invest or reinvest, subject to its contracts with noteholders and 31 bondholders, money or funds held by the corporation, including funds in the [IN- 01 STATE NATURAL GAS PIPELINE FUND (AS 31.25.100) AND THE] Alaska 02 liquefied natural gas project bond fund (AS 31.25.150 [AS 31.25.110]), in obligations 03 or other securities or investments in which banks or trust companies in the state may 04 legally invest funds held in reserves or sinking funds or funds not required for 05 immediate disbursement, and in certificates of deposit or time deposits secured by 06 obligations of, or guaranteed by, the state or the United States; 07 (22) enter into, as it determines to be necessary or appropriate, any 08 swap or hedge, cap, or other contract providing for payments based on levels of or 09 changes in interest rates or indices or in the cost or price of any commodity, supply, or 10 expense expected to be used or incurred in connection with the acquisition, 11 construction, or operation of any facility or property owned, leased, or operated by the 12 corporation, or an option with respect to any of the foregoing; 13 (23) except as provided in (g) of this section, acquire an ownership or 14 participation interest in an Alaska liquefied natural gas project, natural gas treatment 15 facilities, natural gas pipeline facilities, liquefaction facilities, marine terminal 16 facilities related to the infrastructure of an Alaska liquefied natural gas project, or an 17 entity or joint venture that has an ownership interest in or is engaged in the planning, 18 financing, acquisition, maintenance, construction, and operation of an Alaska liquefied 19 natural gas project; 20 (24) after consultation with the commissioner of revenue and the 21 commissioner of natural resources, enter into contracts relating to an Alaska liquefied 22 natural gas project, including contracts for services related to operation, marketing, 23 transportation, gas treatment, marine terminal operation, or liquefaction. 24 * Sec. 9. AS 31.25.080 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 25 (h) The corporation shall, to the maximum extent possible, use contractors and 26 suppliers in the state in order to benefit from the experience of workers and businesses 27 in the state in arctic engineering and construction. 28 * Sec. 10. AS 31.25.090(f) is amended to read: 29 (f) Subject to the restrictions in this section, the [THE] corporation may 30 enter into confidentiality agreements necessary to acquire or provide information to 31 carry out its functions. If a state agency determines that a law or provision of a 01 contract to which the state agency is a party requires the state agency to preserve the 02 confidentiality of the information and that delivering the information to the 03 corporation would violate the confidentiality provision of that law or contract, the state 04 agency shall 05 (1) identify the applicable law or contract provision to the corporation; 06 and 07 (2) obtain the consent of the person who has the right to waive the 08 confidentiality of the information under the applicable law or contract provision before 09 the state agency transfers the information to the corporation. 10 * Sec. 11. AS 31.25.090 is amended by adding new subsections to read: 11 (j) A confidentiality agreement entered into under (f) of this section may not 12 (1) prevent compliance with an administrative or court order 13 mandating disclosure; 14 (2) make confidential contract terms, or prospective contract terms, 15 that could extend to or encumber the state with fiscal or performance liability, 16 obligation, or risk, either directly or indirectly; 17 (3) except as provided in (k) of this section, make confidential 18 information that may lead to 19 (A) a significant fiscal liability, obligation, or risk to the state; 20 or 21 (B) appropriations or other state funding or in-kind payments 22 or services from the state; 23 (4) make confidential the ownership or management structure of a 24 subsidiary of the corporation; or 25 (5) make confidential information related to the existence of a state 26 interest option under AS 31.25.125. 27 (k) A confidentiality agreement entered into under (f) of this section may 28 make confidential specific known or reasonably anticipated project economics or costs 29 related to the Alaska liquefied natural gas project only if 30 (1) one or more parties to the agreement reasonably assert that release 31 of the project economics or costs would cause commercial or competitive harm to an 01 entity involved in the Alaska liquefied natural gas project; and 02 (2) the parties to the contract agree to release reasonable estimated 03 ranges or a summarization of project economics and costs sufficient for a legislator or 04 a public agent to assess the fiscal liability, obligation, or risk to the state, to the extent 05 that the ranges or summarization does not cause commercial or competitive harm to an 06 entity involved in the Alaska liquefied natural gas project. 07 (l) In this section, 08 (1) "public agent" means 09 (A) a public agency, as defined in AS 40.25.220, or an agent or 10 contractor of a public agency; 11 (B) an agent or contractor of a member of the legislature or of a 12 legislative committee; 13 (2) "revenue-generating project" has the meaning given in 14 AS 31.25.125(i). 15 * Sec. 12. AS 31.25.120 is amended to read: 16 Sec. 31.25.120. Creation of subsidiaries. The corporation may create 17 subsidiary corporations for the purpose of developing, constructing, operating, and 18 financing in-state natural gas pipeline projects or other transportation mechanisms; for 19 the purpose of aiding in the development, construction, operation, and financing of in- 20 state natural gas pipeline projects; or for the purpose of acquiring natural gas from the 21 North Slope, and natural gas from other regions of the state, including the state's outer 22 continental shelf, and making that natural gas available to markets in the state, 23 including the delivery of natural gas, including propane and other hydrocarbons 24 associated with natural gas other than oil, to coastal communities in the state, or for 25 export. Subject to the limitations for the use of money appropriated to [THE IN- 26 STATE NATURAL GAS PIPELINE FUND (AS 31.25.100) AND] the Alaska 27 liquefied natural gas project bond fund (AS 31.25.150 [AS 31.25.110]), the 28 corporation may transfer assets of the corporation to a subsidiary created under this 29 section. A subsidiary created under this section may borrow money and issue bonds as 30 evidence of that borrowing and has all the powers of the corporation that the 31 corporation grants to it. Unless otherwise provided by the corporation, the debts, 01 liabilities, and obligations of a subsidiary corporation created under this section are not 02 the debts, liabilities, or obligations of the corporation. 03 * Sec. 13. AS 31.25.120 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 04 (b) The corporation may transfer, sell, or otherwise dispose of an ownership or 05 management interest in a subsidiary of the corporation only after the legislature has 06 had the opportunity to disapprove the issuance of the transfer, sale, or disposition. 07 Legislative disapproval under this subsection must be by law. The corporation shall 08 notify the presiding officer of each house if the corporation intends to transfer, sell, or 09 otherwise dispose of an ownership or management interest in a subsidiary of the 10 corporation. The legislature shall have 90 days to consider the transfer, sale, or 11 disposition. If the legislature does not disapprove the transfer, sale, or disposition of an 12 ownership interest within 90 days, the corporation may move forward with the 13 transfer, sale, or disposition. 14 * Sec. 14. AS 31.25 is amended by adding a new section to read: 15 Sec. 31.25.125. Involvement in revenue-generating projects. (a) If the 16 corporation negotiates with another entity for participation by the corporation in a 17 revenue-generating project, the corporation shall negotiate an option for the state or, 18 subject to (h) of this section, a municipality to acquire an interest in the project. The 19 corporation shall immediately notify the president of the senate, the speaker of the 20 house of representatives, and the chairs of the finance committee of each house of the 21 legislature on each occasion that an option for the state is available for consideration 22 by the legislature under (b)(1) of this section. 23 (b) An option exercisable under this section 24 (1) by the state must, before being exercised, be approved by the 25 legislature by law; and 26 (2) must allow the state or a municipality at least 180 days to exercise 27 the option after notification of the legislature under (d) of this section. 28 (c) At the request of the legislature, a state agency shall cooperate with and 29 assist the legislature in determining whether to approve under (b)(1) of this section the 30 terms of an option for the state negotiated under (a) of this section. 31 (d) The corporation shall immediately notify the president of the senate, the 01 speaker of the house of representatives, and the chairs of the finance committee of 02 each house of the legislature on each occasion that the state may exercise an option 03 negotiated under (a) of this section. 04 (e) The state may not acquire an interest in a revenue-generating project under 05 this section unless the interest is approved by the legislature by law. When making an 06 investment decision under this section, the legislature shall act as a prudent investor. 07 (f) The Department of Revenue shall cooperate with and assist the legislature 08 in determining whether to acquire an interest in a revenue-generating project under (e) 09 of this section by exercising an option negotiated under (a) of this section, including 10 by identifying potential funding sources for exercising the option and potential fiscal 11 effects on the state. If requested by the legislature, another state agency shall cooperate 12 with and assist the legislature with making a determination under (e) of this section. 13 (g) The corporation, and any other entity participating in a revenue-generating 14 project, shall 15 (1) cooperate with and assist the legislature in determining whether to 16 approve the terms of an option negotiated under (a) of this section or to acquire an 17 interest in the project by exercising an option negotiated under this section; 18 (2) provide information requested by the legislature related to the 19 project, including 20 (A) information necessary for the legislature to act as a prudent 21 investor; and 22 (B) financial records of or related to the revenue-generating 23 project; and 24 (3) ensure that at least one representative of the corporation and of 25 each participating entity are available to testify during public hearings of legislative 26 committees requesting testimony. 27 (h) If the corporation negotiates with another entity for participation by the 28 corporation in a revenue-generating project under (a) of this section, the corporation 29 shall provide an opportunity for municipalities in the state to purchase a portion of the 30 corporation's right to acquire additional equity interest in the natural gas project not 31 exercised by the corporation, through an entity managed by the corporation. A 01 municipality may not acquire a direct interest in a revenue-generating project under 02 this subsection. 03 (i) In this section, 04 (1) "corporation" includes a subsidiary of the corporation; 05 (2) "revenue-generating project" means a project, entity ownership, 06 legal business arrangement, partnership, joint venture, or other commercial endeavor 07 expected to generate revenue. 08 * Sec. 15. AS 31.25.130(a) is amended to read: 09 (a) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter and except for 10 AS 44.62.310 - 44.62.319 (Open Meetings Act), AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure 11 Act) does not apply to this chapter. The corporation shall make available to members 12 of the public copies of the regulations adopted under (b) - (e) of this section. 13 * Sec. 16. AS 31.25.140(c) is amended to read: 14 (c) To further ensure effective budgetary decision making by the legislature, 15 the board shall 16 (1) annually review the corporation's assets, including the assets of 17 [THE IN-STATE NATURAL GAS PIPELINE FUND UNDER AS 31.25.100 AND] 18 the Alaska liquefied natural gas project bond fund under AS 31.25.150 19 [AS 31.25.110], to determine whether assets of the corporation exceed an amount 20 required to fulfill the purposes of the corporation as defined in this chapter; in making 21 its review, the board shall determine whether, and to what extent, assets in excess of 22 the amount required to fulfill the purposes of the corporation during the next fiscal 23 year are available without 24 (A) breaching an agreement entered into by the corporation; 25 (B) materially impairing the operations or financial integrity of 26 the corporation; or 27 (C) materially affecting the ability of the corporation to fulfill 28 the purposes of the corporation as defined in this chapter; 29 (2) specifically identify in the corporation's assets the amounts that the 30 board believes are necessary to meet the requirements of (1)(C) of this subsection; and 31 (3) present to the legislature by January 10 of each year a complete 01 accounting of all assets of the corporation, including assets of [THE IN-STATE 02 NATURAL GAS PIPELINE FUND UNDER AS 31.25.100 AND] the Alaska 03 liquefied natural gas project bond fund under AS 31.25.150 [AS 31.25.110], and a 04 report of the review and determination made under (1) and (2) of this subsection; the 05 accounting shall be audited by an independent outside auditor. 06 * Sec. 17. AS 31.25 is amended by adding new sections to article 1 to read: 07 Sec. 31.25.145. Accounting. (a) The corporation shall deposit into separate 08 accounts in the general fund revenue 09 (1) generated by a subsidiary of the corporation; and 10 (2) resulting from an option negotiated under AS 31.25.125. 11 (b) The legislature may appropriate the annual estimated amount necessary for 12 the payment of obligations associated with bonds issued by the corporation to the 13 Alaska liquefied natural gas project bond fund (AS 31.25.150). 14 Sec. 31.25.150. Alaska liquefied natural gas project bond fund. The Alaska 15 liquefied natural gas project bond fund is established in the corporation and consists of 16 money appropriated to the fund. The corporation shall determine fund management 17 and may contract with the Department of Revenue for fund management. The 18 corporation may use money in the fund without further appropriation for the purpose 19 of paying obligations associated with bonds issued by the corporation. 20 * Sec. 18. AS 31.25.160 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 21 (g) The corporation shall immediately notify the president of the senate, the 22 speaker of the house of representatives, and the chairs of the finance committee of 23 each house of the legislature on each occasion on which the corporation intends to 24 issue bonds. The corporation, or a subsidiary of the corporation, may issue bonds only 25 after the legislature approves the issuance of the bonds by law. The legislature shall 26 have 90 days after the notification under this subsection to approve the issuance of the 27 bonds. If the legislature does not approve the issuance of the bonds within 90 days, the 28 corporation may not issue the bonds. The limitation in this subsection does not apply 29 to refunding bonds. Refunding bonds may be issued without further approval by the 30 legislature in a principal amount sufficient to provide funds for the payment of all 31 bonds to be refunded by the refunding bonds and, in addition, for the payment of all 01 other amounts that the corporation considers appropriate in connection with the 02 refunding, including expenses incident to the redeeming, calling, retiring, or paying of 03 the outstanding bonds, the funding of reserves, and the issuance of the refunding 04 bonds. 05 * Sec. 19. AS 31.25.270 is amended by adding new subsections to read: 06 (d) By February 15 and August 15 of each year, the board shall deliver a 07 report on natural gas pipeline projects in the state to the commissioner of revenue, 08 notify the governor and the legislature that the report is available, and publish notice to 09 the public on the Alaska Online Public Notice System under AS 44.62.175 that the 10 report is available on the corporation's Internet website. The board shall prepare the 11 report regardless of whether the corporation owns or operates the projects. The report 12 must 13 (1) provide a current status of natural gas projects in the state, 14 including construction status, projected timeline for completion, and a 15 description of any remaining phases of construction; 16 (2) provide a qualitative assessment and update of the timeline, budget, 17 and cost containment progress since the last report; 18 (3) provide an assessment of the effect of the projects on the state labor 19 market, including 20 (A) the number of jobs created or affected, listed by region of 21 the state; 22 (B) the total estimated payroll dollars attributable to the 23 projects since the last report; and 24 (C) the proportion of resident and nonresident employees or 25 contractors working on the projects; 26 (4) set out secured intake and offtake contracts, by annual volume; and 27 (5) provide total capital expenditures for each major component of the 28 projects; an entity invested in a project with the corporation shall provide to the 29 corporation the information necessary to meet the requirements of this paragraph; in 30 this paragraph, "capital expenditure" means a cost that is properly chargeable to a 31 capital account under federal income tax principals, as determined at the time the 01 property is paid for. 02 (e) The corporation shall maintain on the corporation's Internet website a 03 publicly accessible dashboard for project accountability for each natural gas pipeline 04 project. The dashboard must 05 (1) show the status of each major phase of the project, including front- 06 end and preliminary front-end engineering design, permits, financing, final investment 07 decision, notice to proceed, procurement, construction, startup, commercial 08 operations, phase two final investment decision, expansion, and decommissioning 09 planning; 10 (2) if the state exercises an option to invest in the natural gas pipeline 11 project, include the public cost estimate range, estimate class if available, schedule 12 baseline, current forecast, and summary explanation of material changes or variances; 13 (3) include a material risk register and mitigation status; 14 (4) provide the status of permitting and rights-of-way; 15 (5) include information on 16 (A) gas supply and offtake status by aggregate annual volume; 17 and 18 (B) in-state gas delivery and ratepayer protection status; 19 (6) include the status of the spur line, as defined in AS 42.05.438; 20 (7) include the status of community impact grants and mitigation; 21 (8) provide information regarding the number and proportion of state 22 resident hires and resident contractor or supplier participation; 23 (9) be updated at least monthly before commencement of commercial 24 operations of the natural gas pipeline project and at least quarterly thereafter; and 25 (10) be updated within 10 business days after the corporation becomes 26 aware of a material change affecting cost, schedule, financing, permitting, in-state gas 27 delivery, ratepayer protection, community impacts, state fiscal exposure, or other 28 public-interest issue affecting the natural gas pipeline project. 29 (f) The corporation may use reasonable redactions, estimated ranges, 30 summaries, or status indicators to protect confidential or commercially sensitive 31 information on the dashboard required by (e) of this section. 01 (g) The corporation shall preserve dashboard updates made under (e) of this 02 section in a public archive on the corporation's Internet website, with date-stamped 03 changes and version history. 04 (h) A project developer shall provide to the corporation the information 05 required for the dashboard under (e) of this section. In this subsection, "project 06 developer" means an entity responsible for coordinating the financing and construction 07 of a natural gas pipeline project. 08 (i) In this section, 09 (1) "natural gas pipeline project" includes the Alaska liquefied natural 10 gas project or a similar project; 11 (2) "major component of the project" means a natural gas treatment 12 facility, carbon capture or underground storage facility, liquefaction facility, import or 13 export facility, or any other major facility associated with a natural gas pipeline 14 project. 15 * Sec. 20. AS 31.25 is amended by adding a new section to read: 16 Sec. 31.25.285. Legislative notification of ownership change. (a) The 17 corporation shall promptly notify the president of the senate, the speaker of the house 18 of representatives, and the chairs of the finance committee of each house of the 19 legislature if 20 (1) the corporation becomes aware that an entity in a legal relationship 21 with the corporation, or a subsidiary of the corporation, plans to make a significant 22 change in ownership structure; or 23 (2) an entity in a legal relationship with the corporation, or a subsidiary 24 of the corporation, has a significant change in ownership structure. 25 (b) In this section, "legal relationship" means a partnership, joint venture, joint 26 ownership agreement, or other legally binding business arrangement 27 (1) of which the corporation, or a subsidiary of the corporation, has at 28 least a 10 percent interest; or 29 (2) that has an interest in a third entity in which the corporation, or a 30 subsidiary of the corporation, also has at least a 10 percent interest; and 31 (3) that formed for the purpose of shared ownership or shared 01 management of, or pooling of resources for, an entity in which the corporation, or a 02 subsidiary of the corporation, has an ownership or management interest. 03 * Sec. 21. AS 31.25.390 is amended by adding a new paragraph to read: 04 (8) "subsidiary of the corporation" means a subsidiary controlled by 05 the corporation. 06 * Sec. 22. AS 37.05 is amended by adding a new section to article 6 to read: 07 Sec. 37.05.615. Alaska affordable heating fuel fund. (a) The Alaska 08 affordable heating fuel fund is created as a separate fund in the state treasury. The 09 fund consists of the amount determined and deposited in the fund under (b) of this 10 section and interest earned on the fund balance. 11 (b) The amount to be deposited in (a) of this section is 20 percent of the 12 revenue received from the state's royalty gas transported in an Alaska liquefied natural 13 gas project that remains after the payment to the Alaska permanent fund under 14 AS 37.13.010. The deposit made under this section may not interfere with the deposit 15 to the Alaska affordable energy fund (AS 37.05.610) or the contribution to the public 16 school trust fund (AS 37.14.150). 17 (c) The legislature may make appropriations from the Alaska affordable 18 heating fuel fund to fund programs that will reduce the cost of heating fuel in areas of 19 the state that are not expected to have or do not have direct access to a North Slope 20 natural gas pipeline. 21 (d) Nothing in this section creates a dedicated fund. 22 (e) In this section, 23 (1) "Alaska liquefied natural gas project" has the meaning given in 24 AS 31.25.390; 25 (2) "North Slope natural gas pipeline" has the meaning given in 26 AS 42.06.630. 27 * Sec. 23. AS 42.05 is amended by adding new sections to read: 28 Sec. 42.05.435. Alaska liquefied natural gas project gas supply contracts. 29 (a) The commission may not approve a gas supply contract between a public utility 30 and an owner or operator of a gas pipeline advanced, operated, or owned, in whole or 31 in part, by the Alaska Gasline Development Corporation, or a subsidiary of the 01 corporation, that obligates the utility to pay more than $16 for each 1,000,000 British 02 thermal units of natural gas. 03 (b) The dollar amount in (a) of this section shall be adjusted each year for 04 inflation under the agreed-on escalation factor in the terms of the gas supply contract. 05 (c) In this section, "gas pipeline" has the meaning given in AS 31.25.390. 06 Sec. 42.05.438. Alaska liquefied natural gas project utility contract 07 requirements. (a) In addition to other approval requirements under this chapter, a 08 public utility must obtain the approval of the commission to recover costs related to a 09 contract with a duration of more than one year that reserves capacity in a gas pipeline 10 or liquefied natural gas plant. In this subsection, "contract" includes any agreement 11 that contains conditions that must be satisfied before the agreement becomes effective. 12 (b) The commission may not approve a gas supply contract for natural gas 13 transported by a gas pipeline, or a contract that requires approval under (a) of this 14 section, that 15 (1) requires the utility's customers to assume cost overruns from 16 construction of an Alaska liquefied natural gas project; or 17 (2) increases a commission-approved rate if throughput decreases. 18 (c) In this section, 19 (1) "Alaska liquefied natural gas project" has the meaning given in 20 AS 31.25.390; 21 (2) "gas pipeline" and "liquefied natural gas plant" mean a gas pipeline 22 or liquefied natural gas plant associated with an Alaska liquefied natural gas project; 23 "gas pipeline" does not include a spur line; 24 (3) "spur line" 25 (A) means 26 (i) a natural gas transmission or lateral line that 27 branches from the main gas pipeline for the primary purpose of 28 delivering natural gas to a local community or utility distribution 29 system; and 30 (ii) compressing and metering equipment and 31 interconnection facilities related to the transmission or lateral line 01 described in (i) of this subparagraph; 02 (B) does not include infrastructure used for the export of 03 natural gas or lateral lines not necessary for delivering natural gas to a local 04 community or utility distribution system. 05 * Sec. 24. AS 43.56.010(a) is amended to read: 06 (a) Except as provided in AS 43.59.010 and 43.59.020, an [AN] annual tax 07 of 20 mills is levied each tax year beginning January 1, 1974, on the full and true 08 value of taxable property taxable under this chapter. 09 * Sec. 25. AS 43.56.020(d) is amended to read: 10 (d) Taxable property subject to tax abatement under AS 43.59.010 or the 11 volumetric tax imposed under AS 43.59.020 [OF A NATURAL GAS PIPELINE 12 PROJECT OWNED OR FINANCED BY THE ALASKA GASLINE 13 DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION OR A JOINT VENTURE, PARTNERSHIP, OR 14 OTHER ENTITY THAT INCLUDES THE ALASKA GASLINE DEVELOPMENT 15 CORPORATION] is exempt from state taxes levied or authorized under 16 AS 43.56.010(a) and municipal taxes levied or authorized under AS 43.56.010(b) 17 [BEFORE THE COMMENCEMENT OF COMMERCIAL OPERATIONS OF THAT 18 NATURAL GAS PIPELINE PROJECT. IN THIS SUBSECTION, 19 "COMMENCEMENT OF COMMERCIAL OPERATIONS" MEANS THE FIRST 20 FLOW OF NATURAL GAS IN THE PROJECT THAT GENERATES REVENUE 21 TO THE OWNERS OF THE NATURAL GAS PIPELINE PROJECT]. 22 * Sec. 26. AS 43 is amended by adding a new chapter to read: 23 Chapter 59. Natural Gas Project Temporary Tax Abatement and Volumetric Tax. 24 Sec. 43.59.010. Temporary tax abatement. Property of a natural gas project 25 is not subject to the taxes levied under AS 29.45.080, AS 43.56.010, or AS 43.59.020 26 during the temporary tax abatement period. The abatement period begins on the 27 effective date of this section and ends on the earlier of 28 (1) the first day of a consecutive 30-day period in which the natural 29 gas project achieves a throughput of 500,000,000 cubic feet of natural gas a day, 30 calculated as a rolling average over the 30-day period; or 31 (2) five years after the date of commencement of commercial 01 operations of phase one of the natural gas project. 02 Sec. 43.59.020. Imposition of alternative volumetric tax. (a) The owner of 03 property subject to tax under this section shall pay an alternative volumetric tax on the 04 throughput of the property. The alternative volumetric tax applies beginning on the 05 day after the expiration of the abatement period under AS 43.59.010. 06 (b) The volumetric tax is 07 (1) $0.062 for each 1,000 cubic feet of natural gas before 08 commencement of commercial operations of a liquefied natural gas plant related to the 09 natural gas project; 10 (2) $0.106 for each 1,000 cubic feet of natural gas on and after 11 commencement of commercial operations of a liquefied natural gas plant related to the 12 natural gas project; 13 (3) beginning 10 years after commencement of commercial operations 14 of a liquefied natural gas plant related to the natural gas project, in addition to the 15 amount collected under (2) of this subsection, an additional $0.106 for each 1,000 16 cubic feet of natural gas; 17 (4) beginning January 1, 2060, in addition to the amounts collected 18 under (2) and (3) of this subsection, an additional $0.212 for each 1,000 cubic feet of 19 natural gas. 20 (c) Beginning after the first year the tax applies to throughput of a natural gas 21 project under (b)(1) of this section, the tax rates under (b) of this section shall be 22 adjusted on January 1 of each year for inflation, using 100 percent of the average of 23 the annual change over the preceding five calendar years in the Consumer Price Index 24 for all urban consumers for urban Alaska, as determined by the United States 25 Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics. However, the annual adjustment 26 under this subsection must increase the rates by at least one percent and not more than 27 three percent. Each tax rate under (b) of this section shall be adjusted for inflation 28 under this subsection even if the tax rate does not yet apply. 29 (d) An owner of property subject to tax under this section shall, on or before 30 the last day of each month, file a return with the department and with each 31 municipality collecting tax under this section. The return must state the throughput, in 01 cubic feet of natural gas for each day, of property subject to tax for the month 02 preceding the month in which the return is due and include an installment payment for 03 the month of the return. An installment payment is considered delinquent if the 04 payment is not received by the department on or before the last day of each month. 05 (e) The tax levied under this section is due annually, on the calendar year. The 06 owner of the property shall, on or before April 30 each year, pay any remaining tax 07 due under this section for tax accruing from throughput in the previous calendar year. 08 A tax payment under this subsection is considered delinquent if the payment is not 09 received by the department on or before April 30 each year. 10 (f) Notwithstanding AS 43.05.220, if a tax payment or installment payment 11 required under this section is delinquent, the department or a municipality shall assess 12 a penalty of 15 percent of the amount of delinquent taxes and interest on the 13 delinquent taxes, exclusive of penalty, at the rate specified in AS 43.05.225. 14 Sec. 43.59.030. Collection and allocation of alternative tax. (a) The 15 department shall levy and collect the alternative volumetric tax imposed by this 16 chapter that is allocated to the state. Unless otherwise elected by the municipality 17 under (h) of this section, a municipality that is not in the unorganized borough may 18 levy and collect the portion of the alternative volumetric tax imposed by this chapter 19 that is allocated to the municipality. The amount of tax allocated to each municipality 20 and to the state is determined under (b) - (f) of this section. 21 (b) Before commencement of commercial operations of a liquefied natural gas 22 plant related to a natural gas project, 23 (1) six percent of the tax under AS 43.59.020(b)(1) is allocated to the 24 North Slope Borough; 25 (2) 47 percent of the tax under AS 43.59.020(b)(1) is allocated to the 26 areas of the state through which a gas pipeline runs; and 27 (3) 47 percent of the tax under AS 43.59.020(b)(1) is allocated to the 28 state for community assistance payments. 29 (c) On and after the commencement of commercial operations of a liquefied 30 natural gas plant related to a natural gas project, 31 (1) 48.4 percent of the tax under AS 43.59.020(b)(2) is allocated to the 01 Kenai Peninsula Borough; 02 (2) 27 percent of the tax under AS 43.59.020(b)(2) is allocated to the 03 North Slope Borough; 04 (3) 5.6 percent of the tax under AS 43.59.020(b)(2) is allocated to the 05 state; 06 (4) 9.5 percent of the tax under AS 43.59.020(b)(2) is allocated to the 07 areas of the state through which a gas pipeline runs; 08 (5) 9.5 percent of the tax under AS 43.59.020(b)(2) is allocated to the 09 state for community assistance payments; 10 (6) 100 percent of the tax under AS 43.59.020(b)(3) is allocated to the 11 state for community assistance payments; and 12 (7) 100 percent of the tax under AS 43.59.020(b)(4) is allocated to the 13 state. 14 (d) For purposes of (b)(2) and (c)(4) of this section, the portion allocated to 15 the state is equal to the proportion of the gas pipeline in the unorganized borough, and 16 the portion allocated to each municipality that is not in the unorganized borough is 17 equal to the proportion of the gas pipeline in the municipality. To determine the 18 proportional distribution under this subsection, the length of pipeline in the 19 unorganized borough or a municipality that is not in the unorganized borough is 20 divided by the total length of the pipeline. 21 (e) Each year, the legislature may appropriate the amount allocated to the state 22 under (b)(3), (c)(5), and (c)(6) of this section to the municipalities, communities, and 23 reserves in the unorganized borough, distributed as community assistance payments in 24 accordance with AS 29.60.855 and 29.60.860. 25 (f) The amount of tax allocated to the state under (c)(3) and (7) of this section 26 shall be deposited into the general fund. 27 (g) Each month, the department shall report to a municipality collecting tax 28 under this section the amount of tax allocated to the municipality for the preceding 29 month. 30 (h) A municipality may by ordinance elect for the department to collect, on 31 behalf of the municipality, the portion of the tax levied under this chapter that is 01 allocated to the municipality. 02 Sec. 43.59.040. Administrative appeals; distraint of property. (a) A 03 decision by the department regarding the imposition or calculation of the tax levied 04 under AS 43.59.020 may be appealed to the department for an informal conference 05 under AS 43.05.240, and a final decision may be appealed to the office of 06 administrative hearings under AS 43.05.405. 07 (b) The remedy of distraint of property set out in AS 43.20.270 applies to the 08 tax levied in this chapter. However, only the property subject to tax under 09 AS 43.59.020 may be distrained. 10 Sec. 43.59.050. Termination of status; application. (a) The tax abatement 11 under AS 43.59.010 and the alternative volumetric tax under AS 43.59.020 do not 12 apply to a natural gas project if, by 13 (1) January 1, 2028, a final investment decision has not been made on 14 phase one of the natural gas project; 15 (2) January 1, 2037, at least one major component of the natural gas 16 project has not been completed and commencement of commercial operations of that 17 component has not occurred. 18 (b) If, under (a) of this section, neither the tax abatement under AS 43.59.010 19 nor the alternative volumetric tax under AS 43.59.020 applies to property of a natural 20 gas project, the property is subject to all other state and municipal taxes on taxable 21 property, including taxes levied under AS 29.45.080 and AS 43.56.010. 22 (c) In this section, 23 (1) "commencement of construction" means the 24 (A) laying and welding together in an excavated trench 25 multiple sections of steel pipe that are intended for use as part of the gas 26 pipeline; and 27 (B) establishment of at least one work camp along the gas 28 pipeline route that is intended to provide crew quarters and services during 29 construction of the gas pipeline; 30 (2) "final investment decision" means a final affirmative decision of a 31 natural gas project developer or a subsidiary of the primary project owner to proceed 01 from the planning phase to the implementation and construction phase of phase one of 02 the natural gas project; a final investment decision has not been made until the project 03 developer or a subsidiary of the primary project owner has 04 (A) obtained firm commitments for all debt and financing 05 required to construct phase one of the project; 06 (B) entered into binding engineering, procurement, and 07 construction agreements for construction of phase one of the project; 08 (C) entered into offtake agreements sufficient to underwrite 09 construction and operation of phase one of the project; 10 (D) completed a cost estimate for phase one of the project; 11 (E) completed a final resource report of phase one of the 12 project. 13 Sec. 43.59.060. Reporting; regulations. (a) The owner of property subject to 14 tax under this chapter shall, at the request of the department, provide to the department 15 the information necessary to calculate the tax under this chapter. Notwithstanding 16 AS 40.25.100(a) and AS 43.05.230, the department shall hold confidential proprietary 17 information provided to the department under this subsection at the request of the 18 owner. In this subsection, "proprietary information" means information that, if 19 publicly disclosed, would adversely affect the competitive position of the owner or 20 materially diminish the commercial value of the information to the owner. 21 (b) The department shall adopt regulations under AS 44.62 (Administrative 22 Procedure Act) to implement this chapter, including procedures for 23 (1) measuring throughput; 24 (2) throughput reporting; 25 (3) calculating the rolling average of throughput; and 26 (4) allocating the tax levied under this chapter to the state and 27 municipalities under AS 43.59.030. 28 Sec. 43.59.100. Definitions. In this chapter, 29 (1) "commencement of commercial operations" means the first flow of 30 natural gas through a natural gas project or a component of a natural gas project, as 31 applicable, that treats, transports, or processes a commercial amount of natural gas; 01 (2) "gas pipeline" 02 (A) means a main natural gas pipeline from the outlet flange of 03 the gas treatment plant on the North Slope to 04 (i) for purposes of phase one of the project, the inlet 05 flange of infrastructure providing natural gas to the Southcentral region 06 of the state; 07 (ii) for purposes of phase two of the project, the inlet 08 flange of the liquefied natural gas plant located in the Kenai Peninsula 09 region of the state; 10 (B) does not include any gas lines downstream of any offtake 11 point between a gas treatment plant and a liquefied natural gas plant; 12 (3) "gas treatment plant" means a facility and the related activities 13 required to receive natural gas from a Prudhoe Bay unit gas transmission line, a Point 14 Thomson unit gas transmission line, or other facilities, to treat the natural gas to 15 pipeline specifications, to dispose of or deliver byproducts, to deliver liquid products 16 for further transportation, and to deliver treated natural gas for transportation through a 17 gas pipeline; 18 (4) "liquefied natural gas plant" means a facility for liquefying natural 19 gas and includes structures, equipment, underlying land rights, and other associated 20 systems, storage, and facilities for off-loading liquefied natural gas; 21 (5) "natural gas project" and "project" means a natural gas project that 22 includes, collectively, a Prudhoe Bay unit gas transmission line, a Point Thomson unit 23 gas transmission line, a gas pipeline, a gas treatment plant, a liquefied natural gas 24 plant, and a marine terminal; in this paragraph, 25 (A) "marine terminal" means a terminal and those facilities 26 required to receive liquefied natural gas from the boundary of the liquefied 27 natural gas plant for marine transportation, including auxiliary vessels used in 28 the operation of the terminal; 29 (B) "Point Thomson unit gas transmission line" means a natural 30 gas transmission line from the outlet flange of the Point Thomson unit 31 production facility to the inlet flange of the gas treatment plant; and 01 (C) "Prudhoe Bay unit gas transmission line" means a natural 02 gas transmission line from the outlet flange of the Prudhoe Bay unit central gas 03 facility to the inlet flange of the gas treatment plant; 04 (6) "phase one" means a phase of a natural gas project that includes a 05 gas pipeline and other related infrastructure required for the transportation of natural 06 gas from the North Slope to the Southcentral region of the state; 07 (7) "phase two" means a phase of a natural gas project that includes a 08 gas treatment plant, a marine terminal, a liquefied natural gas plant, and other related 09 infrastructure required for the export of natural gas; 10 (8) "throughput" 11 (A) means 12 (i) the volume of natural gas measured by summing all 13 volumes sold or otherwise delivered at each outlet or offtake point 14 along the gas pipeline; and 15 (ii) natural gas consumed as fuel for the operation of a 16 liquefaction facility; 17 (B) does not include natural gas consumed as fuel for pipeline 18 compression. 19 * Sec. 27. AS 44.33 is amended by adding a new section to read: 20 Article 13A. Natural Gas Project Municipal Impact Grant Fund. 21 Sec. 44.33.850. Natural gas project municipal impact grant fund. (a) The 22 natural gas project municipal impact grant fund is established in the department. The 23 fund consists of money received by the state from a project developer of an Alaska 24 liquefied natural gas project and appropriated to the fund by the legislature. 25 (b) The department shall use the money appropriated to the fund to timely 26 distribute grants to impacted municipalities for activities, services, or facilities that 27 offset verified actual or reasonably expected effects of construction of a gas pipeline. 28 When administering grants under this subsection, the department shall prioritize grant 29 awards based on the needs of the impacted municipality, the severity of the effects 30 caused by construction of the pipeline, and the correlation of the effect to the 31 construction of the pipeline. The department shall adopt regulations governing the 01 distribution of grants under this subsection. 02 (c) In this section, 03 (1) "department" means the Department of Commerce, Community, 04 and Economic Development; 05 (2) "fund" means the natural gas project municipal impact grant fund 06 established in (a) of this section; 07 (3) "gas pipeline" has the meaning given in AS 31.25.390; 08 (4) "impacted municipality" means the North Slope Borough, 09 Fairbanks North Star Borough, Denali Borough, Municipality of Anchorage, 10 Matanuska-Susitna Borough, and Kenai Peninsula Borough; 11 (5) "project developer" means an entity responsible for coordinating 12 the financing and construction of a natural gas project. 13 * Sec. 28. AS 31.25.100 and 31.25.110 are repealed. 14 * Sec. 29. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 15 read: 16 REQUIRED REPORT: PHASE TWO OF THE ALASKA LIQUEFIED NATURAL 17 GAS PROJECT. (a) Before a final investment decision is made on phase two of the Alaska 18 liquefied natural gas project, the Alaska Gasline Development Corporation shall deliver a 19 report to the senate secretary and the chief clerk of the house of representatives and shall 20 notify the legislature that the report is available. The report must include 21 (1) a discussion and review of the effects and effectiveness of this Act on the 22 Alaska liquefied natural gas project; 23 (2) if applicable, suggestions for additional changes to law related to the 24 Alaska liquefied natural gas project, before implementation of phase two. 25 (b) In this section, 26 (1) "Alaska liquefied natural gas project" has the meaning given in 27 AS 31.25.390; 28 (2) "final investment decision" means a final affirmative decision of a natural 29 gas project developer or a subsidiary of the primary project owner to proceed from the 30 planning phase to the implementation and construction phase of phase two of the Alaska 31 liquefied natural gas project; a final investment decision has not been made until the project 01 developer or a subsidiary of the primary project owner has 02 (A) obtained firm commitments for all debt and financing required to 03 construct phase two of the project; 04 (B) entered into binding engineering, procurement, and construction 05 agreements for construction of phase two of the project; 06 (C) entered into offtake agreements sufficient to underwrite 07 construction and operation of phase two of the project; 08 (D) completed a cost estimate for phase two of the project; 09 (E) completed a final resource report of phase two of the project; 10 (3) "phase two" means a phase of the Alaska liquefied natural gas project that 11 includes a gas treatment plant, a marine terminal, a liquefied natural gas plant, as defined in 12 AS 31.25.390, and other related infrastructure required for the export of liquefied natural gas. 13 * Sec. 30. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 14 read: 15 APPLICABILITY: ALASKA GASLINE DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION 16 CONFIDENTIALITY AGREEMENTS, SUBSIDIARIES, NOTIFICATIONS, LEGAL 17 RELATIONSHIPS. (a) AS 31.25.080(a)(1) and (6), as amended by sec. 8 of this Act, apply to 18 a transfer or disposition occurring on or after the effective date of sec. 8 of this Act. 19 (b) AS 31.25.090(j) and (k), added by sec. 11 of this Act, apply to a confidentiality 20 agreement entered into on or after the effective date of sec. 11 of this Act. 21 (c) AS 31.25.145(a), added by sec. 17 of this Act, applies to revenue generated on and 22 after the effective date of sec. 17 of this Act. 23 (d) AS 31.25.285, added by sec. 20 of this Act, applies to a legal relationship entered 24 into on or after the effective date of sec. 20 of this Act. In this subsection, "legal relationship" 25 has the meaning given in AS 31.25.285(b), added by sec. 20 of this Act. 26 * Sec. 31. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 27 read: 28 TRANSITION: EXISTING OPTIONS. (a) Within 30 days after the effective date of 29 sec. 14 of this Act, the Alaska Gasline Development Corporation shall notify the president of 30 the senate, the speaker of the house of representatives, and the chairs of the finance committee 31 of each house of the legislature of any existing options to invest in a revenue-generating 01 project, as required under AS 31.25.125, added by sec. 14 of this Act. 02 (b) An option for state participation in a revenue-generating project negotiated by the 03 Alaska Gasline Development Corporation agreed to before the effective date of sec. 14 of this 04 Act must allow the state to exercise the option for at least 180 days after the corporation 05 notifies the legislature under AS 31.25.125, added by sec. 14 of this Act. 06 * Sec. 32. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 07 read: 08 CONDITIONAL EFFECT: BILL; NOTIFICATION TO THE REVISOR OF 09 STATUTES. (a) Sections 1 - 5 and 24 - 26 of this Act take effect only if, before January 1, 10 2032, the commissioner of revenue determines that 11 (1) the project developer of a natural gas project has paid the state 12 $40,000,000 within 60 days after a final investment decision is made on phase one of the 13 natural gas project and contractually agrees to pay an additional $40,000,000 to the state 14 within 60 days after a final investment decision is made on phase two of the natural gas 15 project; the legislature may appropriate amounts required to be paid under this section to the 16 natural gas project municipal impact grant fund, established in AS 44.33.850, added by sec. 17 27 of this Act; neither the state nor a corporation of the state may be responsible for the 18 payment or a portion of the payment required by this paragraph; 19 (2) the primary owner of property that could be taxable under AS 43.59.020, 20 added by sec. 26 of this Act, has entered into a project labor agreement for the construction of 21 the gas pipeline; in this paragraph, "project labor agreement" means a comprehensive 22 collective bargaining agreement between the owner of the gas treatment plant, carbon capture 23 facility, liquefied natural gas plant, or gas pipeline and the appropriate labor representatives to 24 ensure expedited construction with labor stability by employing qualified residents of the 25 state; and 26 (3) the project developer of a natural gas project who would be responsible for 27 constructing a spur line has committed to construct the spur line that serves the City of 28 Fairbanks and the Fairbanks North Star Borough; to meet the requirement of this paragraph, 29 (A) the project developer shall commit to, on or before completion of 30 phase one of the project, timely and in good faith begin all necessary permit 31 applications and take action on any other regulatory requirements necessary for the 01 construction of the spur line, including, if the Regulatory Commission of Alaska has 02 jurisdiction over the tariffs, 03 (i) initiating a tariff proceeding; and 04 (ii) filing with the commission for systemwide tariff treatment 05 for the spur line with an economically viable gas sales contract; 06 (B) the project developer shall commit to begin construction on a spur 07 line within one year after receiving all permits and meeting the necessary regulatory 08 requirements described in (A) of this paragraph; and 09 (C) the spur line must 10 (i) have sufficient capacity to serve reasonably projected 11 residential, commercial, and industrial demand in the Interior area of the state; 12 (ii) be scheduled to begin operations within two years after the 13 commencement of commercial operations of a major component of the natural 14 gas project; 15 (iii) be designed to connect with local distribution 16 infrastructure capable of delivering natural gas to the City of Fairbanks and the 17 surrounding urban area; 18 (iv) be designed and operated to deliver gas at the lowest 19 reasonable cost consistent with safe and reliable service; and 20 (v) allocate costs, including capital, financing, and construction 21 costs, justly, reasonably, and not unduly discriminatorily, across all consumers 22 systemwide, including consumers in the area from the North Slope to the 23 Southcentral regions of the state and, to the extent allowed under federal law, 24 export consumers; costs related to financing or construction of the spur line 25 may not be allocated solely to the Interior area of the state. 26 (b) If the commissioner of revenue determines that the conditions in (a) of this section 27 have been met, the commissioner of revenue shall notify the revisor of statutes in writing 28 within 30 days after making the determination. 29 (c) In this section, 30 (1) "economically viable gas sales contract" means a contract, precedent 31 agreement, memorandum of understanding, tariff-supported sales arrangement, or other 01 commercially reasonable arrangement for the sale, delivery, transportation, or distribution of 02 natural gas to serve current or reasonably projected residential, commercial, institutional, 03 utility, or industrial demand in the City of Fairbanks, the Fairbanks North Star Borough, or 04 the surrounding Interior area of the state, including demand aggregated by a public utility, gas 05 distribution utility, local government, state agency, or other entity serving customers in the 06 Interior area of the state; the gas sales contract need not demonstrate that the spur line alone 07 will recover all capital, financing, construction, operation, or maintenance costs solely from 08 customers in the Interior area of the state; 09 (2) "final investment decision" means a final affirmative decision of a natural 10 gas project developer or a subsidiary of the primary project owner to proceed from the 11 planning phase to the implementation and construction phase of the applicable phase of the 12 natural gas project; a final investment decision has not been made until the project developer 13 or a subsidiary of the primary project owner has 14 (A) obtained firm commitments for all debt and financing required to 15 construct the applicable phase of the project; 16 (B) entered into binding engineering, procurement, and construction 17 agreements for construction of the applicable phase of the project; 18 (C) entered into offtake agreements sufficient to underwrite 19 construction and operation of the applicable phase of the project; 20 (D) completed a cost estimate for the applicable phase of the project; 21 (E) completed a final resource report of the applicable phase of the 22 project; 23 (3) "gas pipeline" means a gas pipeline, as defined in AS 31.25.390, that is 24 expected to be subject to the alternative volumetric tax under AS 43.59.020, added by sec. 26 25 of this Act; 26 (4) "phase one" means a phase of a natural gas project that includes a gas 27 pipeline and other related infrastructure required for the transportation of natural gas from the 28 North Slope to the Southcentral region of the state; 29 (5) "phase two" means a phase of a natural gas project that includes a gas 30 treatment plant, a marine terminal, a liquefied natural gas plant, and other related 31 infrastructure required for the export of natural gas; 01 (6) "spur line" 02 (A) means 03 (i) a natural gas transmission or lateral line that branches from 04 the main gas pipeline for the primary purpose of delivering natural gas to the 05 City of Fairbanks and the Fairbanks North Star Borough; and 06 (ii) compressing and metering equipment and interconnection 07 facilities related to the transmission or lateral line described in (i) of this 08 subparagraph; 09 (B) does not include infrastructure used for the export of natural gas or 10 lateral lines not necessary for delivering natural gas to a local community or utility 11 distribution system; 12 (7) "systemwide" means the area from the North Slope to the Southcentral 13 regions of the state. 14 * Sec. 33. If, under sec. 32(a) of this Act, secs. 1 - 5 and 24 - 26 of this Act take effect, they 15 take effect on the day after the date the commissioner of revenue determines that the 16 conditions in sec. 32(a) of this Act have been met. 17 * Sec. 34. Except as provided in sec. 33 of this Act, this Act takes effect immediately under 18 AS 01.10.070(c). Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.